Hawaii, session 2025, HB1393.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that in 2024, the department of agriculture launched a statewide process to address key economic challenges facing the agricultural sector.  Agricultural producers and organizations expressed the need for a unified vision and strategic approach to advance the industry.  The department of agriculture recognizes its pivotal role in this transformation and has developed short-term actions and a long-term strategy aimed at addressing complex issues in 2025 and beyond. The existing agricultural statistics program plays a crucial role in providing agricultural producers and policymakers with essential data to guide short-term decision-making and long-term strategic planning.  However, the department of agriculture recognizes the agriculture sector's challenges with accessing accurate and timely data.  This Act aims to modernize the collection, analysis, and dissemination of agricultural statistics, leveraging electronic data collection methods to provide critical insights into the movement of agricultural goods into the State and between and within the Hawaiian islands, and will include production, sales, and market trends. The objectives of this Act are to collect, analyze, and report data on the production, distribution, and sale of select agricultural products between and within the Hawaiian islands; provide producers with the information needed to make informed decisions about planting, scaling operations, and exploring new market opportunities; provide other decision-makers with key analysis of production, production opportunities, trends, and growth; and support the strategic growth and development of Hawaii's agricultural sector by enhancing the statistics program's data collection, analysis, and reporting capabilities. This Act will fill gaps in the department of agriculture's role to gather, compile, and tabulate agricultural statistics and will help fulfill its obligation under the cooperative agreement with the United States Department of Agriculture, ensuring robust data collection and reporting across the State.  The enhanced program will expand data collection on select commodities, analyze trends, and identify growth opportunities between and within the Hawaiian islands.  These improvements will help producers make better informed decisions on planting, operations, and market expansion, while adapting to changing conditions.  State and county policymakers can further use the data to better allocate public resources to support agriculture and the public. These efforts align with the "Go B.I.G. for Agriculture" initiative to boost local product availability and expand market capacity, driving broader economic impact.  By providing actionable means, this Act will help producers optimize their strategies, reduce costs, and expand market reach, contributing to economic stability for agricultural businesses and the broader Hawaii community. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to revitalize and enhance the department of agriculture's agricultural statistics program and drive forward a key initiative under the department's "Go B.I.G. for Agriculture" initiative to buy local products, invest in agriculture's development, and grow agriculture's scale, ultimately advancing the State's broader goals for sustainable and economically viable agriculture grounded in the cultural heritage of Hawaii. SECTION 2.  Chapter 148, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new part to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "Part    .  agricultural statistics §148-     Agricultural statistics program.  The department shall: (1)  Collect data, analyze, and report on the movement of fresh fruit and vegetable products, between and within the Hawaiian islands; (2)  Develop and maintain electronic systems for capturing and analyzing data on the intra- and inter-island movement of fresh fruit and vegetable products; and (3)  Establish a structured rotation schedule for sector-specific surveys to collect data on agricultural activities, including: (A)  Agricultural theft; (B)  Agricultural tourism; (C)  Aquaculture; (D)  Crop and livestock losses; (E)  Farm technology; (F)  Horticulture and nursery; (G)  Livestock numbers and productivity; (H)  Producer expansion; (I)  Seed; (J)  Tropical fruits; (K)  Vegetable and melons; and (L)  Other surveys, as determined by the department. §148-     Exemption.  Data and information collected by the department for the purposes of this part or collected, compiled, and stored in the agricultural statistics program shall be confidential and shall not be subject to discovery or to disclosure under chapter 92F; provided that nothing in this section shall preclude disclosure of such information in a statistical or aggregate form that does not allow the identification of an individual person or entity.  The State shall not be liable for any dissemination of information collected, compiled, or stored for use in the agricultural statistics program. §148-     Collaboration.  (a)  The department shall collaborate with national and local entities, including the United States Department of Agriculture National Agricultural Statistics Service and Agricultural Marketing Service, United States Bureau of Labor Statistics, university of Hawaii college of tropical agriculture and human resilience, university of Hawaii economic research organization, and other agencies, as needed, to enhance data collection, analysis, and reporting efforts. (b)  The department may establish partnerships with local producers, transportation companies, aggregators, and distributors to facilitate the electronic capture of and access to other data sets." SECTION 3.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $ or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 to carry out the purposes of this Act; provided that the appropriated funds shall be allocated as follows: (1)  $ for the establishment of      full-time equivalent ( FTE) agricultural economist positions; (2)  $ for the establishment of      full-time equivalent ( FTE) research statistician positions; (3)  $ for the establishment of secured office space, equipment, the development of electronic data collection systems, and program expenses for the islands of Hawaii, Kauai, Lanai, Maui, Molokai, and Oahu; and (4)  $ for contracted specialty surveys to be conducted by third-party entities focusing on critical agricultural data needs. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of agriculture for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 3000.